Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1717
Agency contract for professional services; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any firm, other than a bona fide employee working solely for an architect, professional engineer, professional land surveyor, or landscape architect, who offers, agrees, or contracts to solicit or secure agency contracts for professional services for any other company or firm for or who is paid any fee, commission, percentage, gift, or any other consideration contingent upon, or resulting from, the award or the making of a contract for professional services shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 17;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 49.
September 1, 2024